Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 6. Theft of Rented Property

§ 2591.
Theft of rented property.

A person who converts to his or her own use any personal property, other than a motor vehicle leased or rented pursuant to a written agreement that has been entrusted to the person under an agreement in writing that provides for the delivery of that personal property to a particular person or place or at a particular time, abandons it, or refuses or neglects to deliver it to the person or place and at the time specified in the written agreement, or who destroys, secretes, appropriates, converts, sells, or attempts to sell all or any part of it, or who removes or permits or causes it to be removed from this State, without the consent of its owner, shall be:

if the value of the property involved is $900.00 or less, imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $500.00, or both;

if the property involved exceeds $900.00 in value:

imprisoned for not more than two years or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both; or

imprisoned for not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00 if the person has been previously convicted of a violation of this subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

All written agreements for the rental of personal property shall bear a statement in bold face type in the following form:

Click to view

NOTICE FAILURE TO RETURN THE RENTAL PROPERTY WITHIN 72 HOURS AFTER DELIVERY TO YOU OF NOTICE TO RETURN, OR WITHIN 15 DAYS AFTER THIS AGREEMENT HAS EXPIRED OR THE PRESENTING OF FALSE, FICTITIOUS OR MISLEADING IDENTIFICATION MAY BE CONSIDERED AS EVIDENCE OF AN INTENTION TO COMMIT LARCENY.

HISTORY:

Added 1969, No. 165 (Adj. Sess.); amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1995, No. 181 (Adj. Sess.), § 24; 2005, No. 156 (Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2592.
Failure to return a rented or leased motor vehicle.

A person commits the offense of failure to return a rented or leased motor vehicle if the person:

rents or leases a motor vehicle, as defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4(21), pursuant to an agreement in writing that provides for the return of the vehicle to a particular place at a particular time;

intentionally and without good cause fails to return the vehicle to that place within 72 hours after the time and date specified;

does not give notice to the person from whom the vehicle was rented or leased that he or she will not be able to return the vehicle on the date and time stated in the agreement and does not obtain an extension of the date and time on which the vehicle will be returned; and

when the person rented or leased the vehicle, the person was provided the following notice in boldface type:

NOTICE

THE FAILURE TO RETURN A RENTED OR LEASED MOTOR VEHICLE WITHIN 72 HOURS AFTER THE DATE AND TIME SPECIFIED IN THE WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITHOUT EXTENDING THE DATE AND TIME IS A CRIME UNDER VERMONT LAW (13 V.S.A. § 2592) AND MAY RESULT IN A CRIMINAL PENALTY OF UP TO FIVE YEARS IMPRISONMENT OR A $5,000.00 FINE, OR BOTH.

A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned for not more than three years or fined not more than $3,000.00, or both. If the person has been previously convicted of a violation of this section, the person shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 181 (Adj. Sess.), § 25.